Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 80. Growth and Prosperity Act

§ 57-80-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Growth and Prosperity Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 34, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2001.

§ 57-80-3.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and determines that there exists in this state a continuing need for programs to assist certain counties in encouraging economic development, the consequent job creation and retention, additional private investment and increased local and state revenue which together insures the further development of a balanced economy. To achieve these purposes, it is necessary to assist and encourage the creation of growth and prosperity by providing temporary relief from certain taxes within certain counties and within specific supervisors districts in certain other counties to certain business enterprises.

Further, the Legislature finds and determines that the authority granted under this chapter and the purposes to be accomplished hereby are proper governmental and public purposes and that the resulting economic benefits to the state are of paramount importance, mandating that the provisions of this chapter be liberally construed and applied in order to advance the public purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 35, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2001.

§ 57-80-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Approved business enterprise” means any business enterprise seeking to locate or expand in a growth and prosperity county, which business enterprise is approved by the MDA.

“Business enterprise” means any new or expanded (i) industry for the manufacturing, processing, assembling, storing, warehousing, servicing, distributing or selling of any products or goods, including products of agriculture; (ii) enterprises for research and development, including, but not limited to, scientific laboratories; or (iii) such other businesses or industry as will be in furtherance of the public purposes of this chapter as determined by the MDA and which creates a minimum of ten (10) jobs. “Business enterprise” does not include retail or gaming businesses or electrical generation facilities.

“Eligible supervisors district” means:

A supervisors district:

1. As such district exists on January 1, 2001, in which thirty percent (30%) or more of such district’s population as of June 30, 2000, is at or below the federal poverty level according to the official data compiled by the United States Census Bureau as of June 30, 2000, or the official 1990 census poverty rate data (the official 1990 census poverty rate data shall not be used to make any such determination after December 31, 2002); or

2. In which thirty percent (30%) or more of such district’s population is at or below the federal poverty level according to the latest official data compiled by the United States Census Bureau;

Which is contiguous to a county that meets the criteria of Section 57-80-7(1)(b); and

Which is located in a county which has been issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this chapter.

“Growth and prosperity counties” means those counties which meet the requirements of this chapter and which have by resolution or order given its consent to participate in the Growth and Prosperity Program.

“Local tax” means any county or municipal ad valorem tax imposed on the approved business enterprise pursuant to law, except the school portion of the tax and any portion of the tax imposed to pay the cost of providing fire and police protection.

“Local taxing authority” means any county or municipality which by resolution or order has given its consent to participate in the Growth and Prosperity Program acting through its respective board of supervisors or the municipal governing board, council, commission or other legal authority.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“State tax” means:

Any sales and use tax imposed on the business enterprise pursuant to law related to the purchase of component building materials and equipment for initial construction of facilities or expansion of facilities in a growth and prosperity county or supervisors districts, as the case may be;

All income tax imposed pursuant to law on income earned by the business enterprise in a growth and prosperity county, or supervisors district, as the case may be;

Franchise tax imposed pursuant to law on the value of capital used, invested or employed by the business enterprise in a growth and prosperity county, or supervisors district, as the case may be; and

Any sales and use tax imposed on the lease of machinery and equipment acquired in the initial construction to establish the facility or for an expansion, including, but not limited to, leases in existence prior to January 1, 2001, as certified by the MDA, in a growth and prosperity county, or supervisors district, as the case may be.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 36; Laws, 2001, ch. 582, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 392, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 359, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2015).

§ 57-80-7.
Counties eligible for certificate of public convenience and necessity; application requirements; municipal consent to participation in Growth and Prosperity Program [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

From and after December 31, 2000, the following counties may apply to the MDA for the issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity:

Any county of this state which has an annualized unemployment rate that is at least two hundred percent (200%) of the state’s unemployment rate as of December 31 of any year after December 31, 2000, as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security’s most recently published data;

Any county of this state in which thirty percent (30%) or more of the population of the county is at or below the federal poverty level according to the official data compiled by the United States Census Bureau as of August 30, 2000, for counties that apply before December 31, 2002, or the most recent official data compiled by the United States Census Bureau for counties that apply from and after December 31, 2002; or

Any county of this state having an eligible supervisors district.

The application, at a minimum, must contain (a) the Mississippi Department of Employment Security’s most recently published figures that reflect the annualized unemployment rate of the applying county as of December 31 or the most recent official data by the United States Census Bureau required by subsection (1) of this section, as the case may be, and (b) an order or resolution of the county consenting to the designation of the county as a growth and prosperity county.

Any municipality of a designated growth and prosperity county or within an eligible supervisors district and not more than eight (8) miles from the boundary of the county that meets the criteria of subsection (1)(b) of this section may by order or resolution of the municipality consent to participation in the Growth and Prosperity Program.

No incentive or tax exemption shall be given under this chapter without the consent of the affected county or municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 37; Laws, 2001, ch. 582, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 55; Laws, 2006, ch. 499, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 55; Laws, 2009, ch. 399, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 55; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 55; Laws, 2015, ch. 359, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2015); reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 55, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 57-80-9.
Exemption from local taxation; conditions.

Upon the issuance by the MDA of its certificate of public convenience and necessity, designating certain counties as growth and prosperity counties, any approved business enterprise in any such a growth and prosperity county or any approved business enterprise located within an eligible supervisors district within eight (8) miles of the boundary of the county that meets the criteria of Section 57-80-7(1)(b) shall be exempt from all local taxes levied by the county and all state taxes for a period of ten (10) years or until December 31, 2029, whichever occurs first, and upon consent of any municipality within such county or within such supervisors district and not more than eight (8) miles from the boundary of the county that meets the criteria of Section 57-80-7(1)(b), shall be exempt from all local taxes levied by such municipality for a period of ten (10) years or until December 31, 2033, whichever occurs first; however, if the business enterprise is located in an area that has been declared by the Governor to be a disaster area and as a direct result of the disaster the business enterprise is unable to utilize the exemption from state taxes, the MDA may extend the duration of the exemption from state taxes for not more than two (2) years or until December 31, 2033, whichever occurs first. Any business enterprise that has property or equipment purchased utilizing the state tax exemption that is damaged or destroyed as a result of the disaster may purchase replacement equipment and component building materials exempt from sales and use tax.

The following conditions, along with any other conditions the MDA shall promulgate from time to time by rule or regulation, shall apply to such exemptions: (a) any exemption provided under this chapter is nontransferable and cannot be applied, used or assigned to any other person or business or tax account; (b) no approved business enterprise may claim or use the exemption granted under this chapter unless that enterprise is in full compliance with all state and local tax laws, and related ordinances and resolutions; and (c) the approved business enterprise must enter into an agreement with the MDA which sets out, at a minimum the performance requirements of the approved business enterprise during the term of the exemption and provisions for the recapture of all or a portion of the taxes exempted if the performance requirements of the approved business enterprise are not met.

Upon entering into such an agreement, the MDA shall forward such agreement to the Department of Revenue and the affected local taxing authorities so that the exemption can be implemented. The Department of Revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, for the implementation of both local and state exemptions granted under this chapter.

Any business enterprise that relocates its present operation and jobs to a growth and prosperity county or an eligible supervisors district and not more than eight (8) miles from the boundary of the county that meets the criteria of Section 57-80-7(1)(b) from another county in the state shall not receive any of the exemptions granted in this chapter.

If the annualized unemployment rate in a growth and prosperity county falls below one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the state’s annualized unemployment rate for three (3) consecutive calendar years and less than thirty percent (30%) of the population of the county is at or below the federal poverty level according to the most recent official data compiled by the United States Census Bureau as of December 31 of the third of such consecutive calendar years, the tax exemptions authorized under this chapter may not be granted to additional business enterprises.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 38; Laws, 2006, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 399, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 359, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2015); Laws, 2019, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 2019).

§ 57-80-11.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The MDA shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, for the implementation and administration of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 39, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2001.